Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB796.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2301(a), (d)(1), (e) and (e.1)(1) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 2301. Public Transportation Assistance Fund.--(a) There is hereby created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Public Transportation Assistance Fund. Moneys deposited into the fund and interest which accrues from those funds shall be used for the purposes [delineated in 74 Pa.C.S. § 1310 (relating to distribution of funding)] as provided by law.12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *(d) (1) There is hereby imposed on each lease of a motor vehicle subject to tax under Article II an additional tax of [three] five per cent of the total lease price charged.* * *(e) Except as provided in subsection (e.1), there is hereby imposed on each rental of a motor vehicle subject to tax under Article II a fee of [two dollars ($2)] six dollars and fifty cents ($6.50) for each day or part of a day for which the vehicle is rented.(e.1) (1) There is hereby imposed on each rental of a motor vehicle subject to tax under Article II and used in carsharing, a peer-to-peer car-sharing program or car sharing by a shared vehicle owner a fee for each day or part of a day computed according to the following schedule:Rental Interval FeeLess than 2 hours $0.252 to 3 hours $0.50More than 3, but less than 6 hours $1.256 hours or more [$2.00] $6.50* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0796PN0946 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223